Mississippi statutes. Title 29. Public Lands, Buildings and Property
Chapter 15. Public Trust Tidelands

§ 29-15-1.
Definitions.

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources.

“Local tidal datum” means the datum established for a specific tide station through the use of tidal observations made at that station.

“Mean high water” means the arithmetic mean of all the high waters occurring in a particular nineteen-year tidal epoch period; or for a shorter period of time after corrections are applied to the short term observations to reduce these values to the equivalent nineteen-year value.

“Mean high water line” means the intersection of the tidal datum plane of mean high water with the shore.

“Mean high water survey” means a survey of the intersection of the shoreline with the tidal datum plane of mean high water using local tidal datums and surveying methodologies approved by the commission. Methodologies shall include but not be limited to the “staking method,” “the topographic method” and “tide coordinated aerial photography.”

“National map accuracy standards” means a set of guidelines published by the Office of Management and Budget of the United States to which maps produced by the United States government adhere.

“Submerged lands” means lands which remain covered by waters, where the tides ebb and flow, at ordinary low tides.

“Tidelands” means those lands which are daily covered and uncovered by water by the action of the tides, up to the mean line of the ordinary high tides.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 495, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 52, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 29-15-3.
Declaration of public policy and purpose.

It is declared to be the public policy of this state to favor the preservation of the natural state of the public trust tidelands and their ecosystems and to prevent the despoliation and destruction of them, except where a specific alteration of specific public trust tidelands would serve a higher public interest in compliance with the public purposes of the public trust in which such tidelands are held.

It is hereby declared to be a higher public purpose of this state and the public tidelands trust to resolve the uncertainty and disputes which have arisen as to the location of the boundary between the state’s public trust tidelands and the upland property and to confirm the mean high water boundary line as determined by the Mississippi Supreme Court, the laws of this state and this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 495, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1989).

§ 29-15-5.
Tidelands and submerged lands held in public trust; rights of littoral and riparian property owners.

Tidelands and submerged lands are held by the state in trust for use of all the people, and are so held in their character as the beds and shores of the sea and its tidally affected arms and tributaries for the purposes defined by common law and statutory law. Littoral and riparian property owners have common law and statutory rights under the Coastal Wetlands Protection Law which extend into the waters and beyond the low tide line, and the state’s responsibilities as trustee extends to such owners as well as to the other members of the public.

Residential property owners shall not be required to obtain a tidelands lease for exercising their common law and statutory littoral and riparian rights.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 495, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 403, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2012).

§ 29-15-7.
Map of public trust tidelands; boundary challenges.

The Secretary of State, in cooperation with other state agencies, shall prepare a Preliminary Map of Public Trust Tidelands. The preliminary map shall depict the boundary as the current mean high water line where shoreline is undeveloped and in developed areas or where there have been encroachments, such maps shall depict the boundary as the determinable mean high water line nearest the effective date of the Coastal Wetlands Protection Act.

The state recognizes that the boundary of the public trust tidelands is ambulatory and that the natural inland expansion of tide waters over land not previously subject to the ebb and flow of the tide increases the land subject to the public trust, while natural accretion, the gradual and imperceptible accumulation of land by natural causes, and natural reliction, the increase of land by permanent withdrawal or retrocession of tidal waters by natural causes, diminish the land subject to the public trust and increase the property owned by the contiguous upland owner. Likewise, the state recognizes the common law doctrine as it pertains to such tidelands, submerged lands and riparian and littoral rights and declares such to be the law of this state.

The preliminary map shall be transmitted to each of the chancery clerks of the coastal counties, and each chancery clerk shall post such map in a public place in his office. The Secretary of State shall also cause to be published in a newspaper of general circulation within each coastal county a notice announcing that a copy of the Preliminary Map of Public Trust Tidelands is available for public inspection at the office of the chancery clerk of that county, and shall post a similar notice in at least three (3) public places in each coastal county in this state. The preliminary map shall also be open to public inspection at the office of the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall allow sixty (60) days after publication of the preliminary map for submission of comments and/or additional documentation and may, at his discretion, revise the map accordingly. Within twenty (20) days of the completion of the period for submission of comments, the Secretary of State shall have incorporated any revisions to the Preliminary Map of Public Trust Tidelands and certify its final adoption. The certified map as finally adopted shall be published as provided hereinabove. The final certified map shall be duly recorded in the land records of the chancery clerks office in Hancock, Harrison and Jackson Counties. Upon recordation, the certified map shall be final to those properties not subject to the trust. The Secretary of State shall issue to all consenting property owners a certificate stating that the described property does not lie within the boundary of the public trust tidelands and is not subject to the trust. The Secretary of State shall duly file such certificates with the proper chancery clerks office for recordation. In addition, the certified map shall be placed in the Secretary of State’s permanent register which shall be open to public inspection. Within one hundred twenty (120) days of final adoption of the certified map, the Secretary of State shall determine those property owners whose lands are subject of the public trust and are in violation of such trust. The Secretary of State shall notify all such owners by certified mail and shall include an explanation of the procedure available to the occupant to resolve any dispute with respect to this map. The notice shall also inform occupants that after three (3) years the boundary as set forth in the certified map shall become final unless the occupant has submitted a contrary claim to the office of the Secretary of State. Such property owner shall have six (6) months to negotiate and settle differences with the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State may allow extensions at his discretion. A boundary determination shall be final upon agreement of the Secretary of State and the owner and an instrument setting forth the boundary agreement shall be duly executed and recorded in the chancery court where the property is located. Any such boundary agreement shall be binding on the state and other parties thereto.

If any dispute as to the location of the boundary of the public trust cannot be negotiated and settled between the affected property owners and the Secretary of State within six (6) months after notice by the state of its claim, either the state or a person claiming an interest in the property may apply to the chancery court of the county in which the property is located for a resolution of the dispute and a determination of the location of the boundary. All persons having an interest in the property subject to the dispute shall be made a party to such proceeding. In any such action, the state shall have the burden of proof by a preponderance of evidence that any such land is subject to the trust.

Nothing in this section is intended to preclude any party from pursuing remedies otherwise available at law, including but not limited to those provided in Sections 11-17-1 et seq., except that if no action is taken by the occupant within three (3) years of receipt of notice as described above, the boundary as determined by the certified map shall become final.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 495, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1989).

§ 29-15-9.
Public Trust Tidelands Fund; distribution of funds derived from lease rentals of tidelands and submerged lands; disbursement of funds appropriated as separate line items in appropriation bill.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “Public Trust Tidelands Fund.” The fund shall be administered by the Secretary of State as trustee.

Any funds derived from lease rentals of tidelands and submerged lands, except those funds derived from mineral leases, or funds previously specifically designated to be applied to other agencies, shall be transferred to the special fund. However, funds derived from lease rentals may be used to cover the administrative cost incurred by the Secretary of State. Any remaining funds derived from lease rentals shall be disbursed pro rata to the local taxing authorities for the replacement of lost ad valorem taxes, if any. Then, any remaining funds shall be disbursed to the commission for new and extra programs of tidelands management, such as conservation, reclamation, preservation, acquisition, education or the enhancement of public access to the public trust tidelands or public improvement projects as they relate to those lands.

Any funds that are appropriated as separate line items in an appropriation bill for tideland programs or projects authorized under this section for political subdivisions or other agencies shall be disbursed as provided in this subsection.

The Department of Marine Resources shall make progress payments in installments based on the work completed and material used in the performance of a tidelands project only after receiving written verification from the political subdivision or agency. The political subdivision or agency shall submit verification of the work completed or materials in such detail and form that the department may require.

The Department of Marine Resources shall make funds available for the purpose of using such funds as a match or leverage for federal or other funds that are available for the designated tidelands project.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 495, § 6; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 53; Laws, 2002, ch. 474, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 27, 2002).

§ 29-15-10.
Public Trust Tidelands Assessments Fund; purpose of fund; distribution of funds derived from certain assessments on gaming licensees; disbursement of funds appropriated as separate line items in an appropriation bill.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “Public Trust Tidelands Assessments Fund.” The purpose of the fund is to ensure that monies derived from the public trust tidelands assessments shall be used for the benefit of preserving and protecting the tidelands and submerged lands found within the three (3) most southern counties of the state. One (1) specific purpose of the fund is to ensure that the annual payment made by the state for the purchase of Deer Island shall continue uninterrupted until the purchase transaction is completed. The fund shall be administered by the Secretary of State, as trustee. None of the funds that are in the special fund or that are required to be deposited into the special fund shall be transferred, diverted or in any other manner expended or used for any purpose other than those purposes specified in this section.

Any funds derived from assessments made pursuant to Section 29-1-107(4)(c) shall be deposited into the special fund.

Funds paid pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection may be appropriated by the Legislature in an amount necessary to cover the administrative cost incurred by the Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources. Any remaining funds shall be disbursed by the commission for new and extra programs of tidelands management, such as conservation, reclamation, preservation, acquisition, education or the enhancement of public access to the public trust tidelands or public improvement projects as they relate to those lands.

Any funds that are appropriated as separate line items in an appropriation bill for tideland programs or projects authorized under this section for political subdivisions or other agencies shall be disbursed as provided in this subsection.

The Department of Marine Resources shall make progress payments in installments based on the work completed and material used in the performance of a tidelands project only after receiving written verification from the political subdivision or agency. The political subdivision or agency shall submit verification of the work completed or materials in such detail and form that the department may require.

The Department of Marine Resources shall make funds available for the purpose of using such funds as a match or leverage for federal or other funds that are available for the designated tidelands project.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, 5th Ex Sess, ch. 15, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Oct. 17, 2005).

§ 29-15-11.
Lessee of tidelands or submerged lands responsible for tax levy on leasehold interest.

Upon the proper authorized leasing of any state public trust tidelands, or submerged lands, the lessee shall be responsible for any county or municipal tax levy upon the leasehold interest.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 495, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1989).

§ 29-15-13.
Exemptions from any use or rental fees.

All public projects of any federal, state or local governmental entity which serve a higher public purpose of promoting the conservation, reclamation, preservation of the tidelands and submerged lands, public use for fishing, recreation or navigation, or the enhancement of public access to such lands shall be exempt from any use or rental fees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 495, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1989).

§ 29-15-15.
State public trust tidelands mapping program declared to be in public interest.

The Legislature hereby declares that accurate maps of coastal areas are required for many public purposes, and a state public trust tidelands mapping program establishing uniform standards and procedures is declared to be in the public interest.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 495, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1989).

§ 29-15-17.
Commission to conduct boundary mapping program; additional powers of Commission.

After the preparation and publication of the certified preliminary map, as finally adopted and provided for in Section 29-15-7, the commission is authorized and directed to conduct a comprehensive program of public trust tidelands boundary mapping with the object of providing accurate surveys of such lands of the state.

In addition to other such powers as may be specifically delegated to it, the commission is authorized to perform the following functions:

To coordinate the efforts of all public and private agencies and organizations engaged in the making of tidal surveys and maps of the coastal areas of this state, with the object of avoiding unnecessary duplication and overlapping;

To serve as a coordinating state agency for any program of tidal surveying and mapping conducted by the federal government;

To assist any court, tribunal, administrative agency or political subdivision, and to make available to them information regarding tidal surveying and coastal boundary determinations;

To contract with federal, state or local agencies or with private parties for the performance of any surveys, studies, investigations or mapping activities, for preparation and publication of the results thereof, or for other authorized functions relating to the objectives of this part;

To develop permanent records of tidal surveys and maps of the state’s coastal areas;

To develop uniform specifications and regulations for tidal surveying and mapping coastal areas of the state;

To collect and preserve appropriate survey data from coastal areas; and

To act as a public repository for copies of coastal area maps and to establish a library of such maps and charts.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 495, § 11; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 54, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 29-15-19.
Maps to conform to minimal national map accuracy standards.

All maps produced under this program shall conform at least to minimal national map accuracy standards.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 495, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved March 31, 1989).

§ 29-15-21.
Establishment of local tidal datums and determination of mean high and low water lines; standards.

The establishment of local tidal datums and the determination of the location of the mean high water line or the mean low water line, whether by federal, state or local agencies or private parties, shall be made in accordance with the standards and procedures set forth in this chapter, and in accordance with supplementary regulations promulgated by the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 495, § 13; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 29-15-23.
Establishment of local tidal datums and determination of mean high and low water lines; responsibility; methods.

The establishment of local tidal datums and the determination of the location of the mean high water line or the mean low water line shall be performed by qualified personnel licensed by the Board of Professional Land Surveyors or by representatives of the United States Government when approved by the commission.

The location of the mean high water line or the mean low water line shall be determined by methods which are approved by the commission for the area concerned.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 495, § 14; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 56, eff from and after July 1, 1994.